Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0106

Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

(1) The internal affairs of a limited cooperative association; and

(2) The liability of a member as a member and a director as a director for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited cooperative association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 106.]